Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
CHAPTER 2 Marks and Brands

4-2-1.
Mark, brand, or tattoo registration — Certificates.

Any person owning any livestock and desiring to register a mark, brand, or tattoo shall apply to the Commissioner for a certificate of mark, brand, or tattoo registration. Application for a certificate shall be made on forms provided by the department. Applications shall contain or be accompanied by such information as may be required by rule or regulation. In issuing certificates, the Commissioner shall not issue certificates to more than one person for the same or substantially identical marks, brands, or tattoos. There shall be no charge or fee for registration.

Prior to July 1 of 1974 and on or before the same date every fifth year thereafter, the Commissioner shall purge from his lists of registrations the registrations of all marks, brands, or tattoos which the person to whom they are registered does not desire to retain as a registered mark, brand, or tattoo. Prior to removing a mark, brand, or tattoo from registration, the Commissioner shall, by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, notify the person to whom the mark, brand, or tattoo is registered that the registration will be canceled unless the Commissioner is notified within a period of three months from the date of mailing that such person desires to continue the registration of his mark, brand, or tattoo. If the Commissioner does not receive a reply within three months, he may cancel the registration of such mark, brand, or tattoo and may then reassign such mark, brand, or tattoo to any person seeking to register it, under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the Commissioner.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to transmit a copy of any certificate of mark, brand, or tattoo registration to the judge of the probate court of the county of residence of the person to whom the certificate is issued or to the judge of the probate court of the county in which the animals to be marked, branded, or tattooed are located if the owner thereof is not a resident of this state. The judge of the probate court may record the certificate in a book kept by him for that purpose.

No provision of this chapter shall affect or impair the validity of any mark, brand, or tattoo registered or recorded in the office of the Commissioner prior to April 1, 1974.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 175, § 2; Code 1933, § 62-102, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 1003, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 2/SB 364.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

4-2-2.
Mark, brand, or tattoo registration — Evidential value.

The fact that any livestock is marked, branded, or tattooed with a registered mark or brand shall constitute prima-facie evidence in any trial or proceeding that such livestock belongs to the person to whom the certificate of mark, brand, or tattoo registration for that particular mark, brand, or tattoo was issued. This Code section shall not apply to livestock marked or branded prior to April 1, 1974, unless the mark, brand, or tattoo was registered or recorded in the office of the Commissioner.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1395; Code 1868, § 1452; Code 1873, § 1439; Code 1882, § 1439; Civil Code 1895, § 1758; Civil Code 1910, § 2017; Code 1933, § 62-104; Code 1933, § 62-103, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 1003, § 1.

4-2-3.
Mark, brand, or tattoo registration — Change.

No registered mark, brand, or tattoo shall be changed so as to be of any use to the owner, unless permission is first granted by the Commissioner and the change is recorded.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1398; Code 1868, § 1455; Code 1873, § 1442; Code 1882, § 1442; Civil Code 1895, § 1761; Civil Code 1910, § 2020; Code 1933, § 62-107; Code 1933, § 62-104, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 1003, § 1.

4-2-4.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The Commissioner is authorized to promulgate and adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary or convenient to carry out this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 62-105, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 1003, § 1.

4-2-5.
Administration of chapter and rules and regulations.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to administer this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 175, § 3; Code 1933, § 62-101, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 1003, § 1.